Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4906
Officer's personal information; disclosure prohibited.

(1) An officer's personal information, including, but not limited to, the officer's home address, personal telephone number, personal email address, date of birth, social security number, and operator's license number shall be confidential and shall be redacted from any record prior to the record's release to the public by the employing public safety agency.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the release of an officer's unredacted personal information to the officer's legal counsel, union representative, or designated employee representative upon the request of the officer or his or her personal representative or legal counsel.

(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release of an officer's or a public safety agency's reports pursuant to subdivision (1)(g) of section 29-1912, pursuant to an order of discovery, or pursuant to any other order of a court.

Laws 2026, LB965, § 27.
October 1, 2026